District of Columbia statutes.
29-601.10

Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

(a)

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the Mayor for filing under this chapter does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the Superior Court to order:

(1)

The person to sign the record;

(2)

The person to deliver the record to the Mayor for filing; or

(3)

The Mayor to file the record unsigned.

(b)

If a petitioner under subsection (a) of this section is not the partnership or foreign limited liability partnership to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the partnership a party to the action.

(c)

A record filed under subsection (a)(3) of this section is effective without being signed.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(2)(F), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-601.04 and § 29-601.11.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.